fi: Ilmapatjan sisäinen rakenne: Coil Beam; ComfortCoil; Kaksikerroksinen ilmatasku; Fiber-Tech; Kenno; I-Beam; Tritech; Wave Beam; Muu
vi: Cấu trúc bên trong của nệm hơi: Coil Beam; ComfortCoil; Túi khí hai lớp; Fiber-Tech; Tổ ong; I-Beam; Tritech; Wave Beam; Khác
zh-CN: 气垫床内部结构: 立柱式支撑; ComfortCoil; 双层气袋; Fiber-Tech; 蜂窝; 工字型气柱; Tritech; 波浪型气柱; 其他
sv: Luftmadrassens inre konstruktion: Coil Beam; ComfortCoil; Dual-Layer Air Pocket; Fiber-Tech; Bikakestruktur; I-Beam; Tritech; Wave Beam; Övrigt
da: Indvendig konstruktion af luftmadrasse: Coil beam; ComfortCoil; Dual-layer air pocket; Fiber-Tech; Bikube; I-beam; Tritech; Wave beam; Andet
fr: Technologie interne du matelas gonflable: Faisceau à ressorts (Coil Beam); ComfortCoil; Poche d’air double couche; Fiber-Tech; Nid d’abeilles; Profilé en I; Tritech; Profilé en vagues (Wave Beam); Autre
en: Air bed internal construction: Coil Beam; ComfortCoil; Dual-Layer Air Pocket; Fiber-Tech; Honeycomb; I-Beam; Tritech; Wave Beam; Other
ko: 에어베드 내부 구조: 코일 빔; 컴포트코일; 이중 레이어 에어 포켓; 파이버테크; 허니콤; I-빔; Tritech; 웨이브 빔; 기타
nl: Interne constructie luchtbed: Coil Beam; ComfortCoil; Dual-Layer Air Pocket; Fiber-Tech; Honingraat; I-Beam; Tritech; Wave Beam; Overig
sk-SK: Vnútorná konštrukcia nafukovacej postele: Konštrukcia Coil Beam; ComfortCoil; Dvojvrstvové vzduchové vrecká; Fiber-Tech; Plástová konštrukcia; Konštrukcia I-Beam; Tritech; Konštrukcia Wave Beam; Iné
hu: Felfújható ágy belső felépítése: Coil Beam; ComfortCoil; Dual-Layer Air Pocket; Fiber-Tech; Méhsejt; I-Beam; Tritech; Wave Beam; Egyéb
nb: Innvendig konstruksjon av luftmadrass: Coil beam; ComfortCoil; Tolags luftlomme; Fiber-Tech; Honeycomb; I-beam; Tritech; Wave beam; Annet
cs: Vnitřní konstrukce nafukovací postele: Coil Beam; ComfortCoil; Dvouvrstvá vzduchová kapsa; Fiber-Tech; Plástev; I-Beam; Tritech; Wave Beam; Ostatní
zh-TW: 氣墊床內部結構: Coil Beam; ComfortCoil; 雙層獨立氣柱; Fiber-Tech; 蜂巢; 工字樑; Tritech; 波浪支撐; 其他
th: โครงสร้างภายในของที่นอนลม: Coil Beam; ComfortCoil; Dual-Layer Air Pocket; Fiber-Tech; รังผึ้ง; I-Beam; Tritech; Wave Beam; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Notranja konstrukcija zračne postelje: Coil Beam; ComfortCoil; Dvoslojni zračni žep; Fiber-Tech; Satje; I-Beam; Tritech; Wave Beam; Drugo
es: Construcción interna del colchón de aire: Estructura Coil Beam; ComfortCoil; Cámara de aire de doble capa; Fiber-Tech; Panal; Estructura I-Beam; Tritech; Estructura Wave Beam; Otro
ru: Внутренняя конструкция надувного матраса: Coil Beam; ComfortCoil; Dual-Layer Air Pocket; Fiber-Tech; Honeycomb; I-Beam; Tritech; Wave Beam; Другое
bg-BG: Вътрешна конструкция на надуваемото легло: Coil Beam; ComfortCoil; Двуслоен въздушен джоб; Fiber-Tech; Пчелна пита; I-Beam; Tritech; Wave Beam; Други
pt-BR: Construção interna do colchão de ar: Feixe de molas (Coil Beam); ComfortCoil; Bolsa de ar de dupla camada; Fiber-Tech; Colmeia; I-Beam; Tritech; Wave Beam; Outros
el: Εσωτερική κατασκευή κρεβατιού αέρα: Coil Beam; ComfortCoil; Dual-Layer Air Pocket; Fiber-Tech; Honeycomb; I-Beam; Tritech; Wave Beam; Άλλο
pt-PT: Construção interna do colchão insuflável: Vigas de mola; ComfortCoil; Bolsa de ar de dupla camada; Fiber-Tech; Favo de mel; Viga em I; Tritech; Viga ondulada; Outro
lt-LT: Pripučiamo čiužinio vidinė konstrukcija: „Coil Beam“; „ComfortCoil“; Dviejų sluoksnių oro kišenė; „Fiber-Tech“; Korių formos; Dvitėjinė sija („I-Beam“); Tritech; „Wave Beam“; Kita
de: Innenkonstruktion des Luftbetts: Coil-Beam; ComfortCoil; Dual-Layer-Lufttasche; Fiber-Tech; Wabenstruktur; I-Beam; Tritech; Wave-Beam; Andere
it: Costruzione interna del materasso ad aria: Coil Beam; ComfortCoil; Dual-Layer Air Pocket; Fiber-Tech; Nido d'ape; I-Beam; Tritech; Wave Beam; Altro
ja: エアベッドの内部構造: コイルビーム; コンフォートコイル; デュアルレイヤーエアポケット; ファイバーテック; ハニカム; Iビーム; Tritech; ウェーブビーム; その他
hr-HR: Unutarnja konstrukcija zračnog kreveta: Coil beam; ComfortCoil; Dvoslojni zračni džep; Fiber-Tech; Struktura saća; I-Beam; Tritech; Wave beam; Ostalo
ro-RO: Construcție internă a saltelei pneumatice: Coil Beam; ComfortCoil; Buzunar de aer cu strat dublu; Fiber-Tech; Fagure; I-Beam; Tritech; Wave Beam; Altele
pl: Budowa wewnętrzna materaca nadmuchiwanego: Coil Beam; ComfortCoil; Podwójne komory powietrzne; Fiber-Tech; Struktura plastra miodu; I-Beam; Tritech; Wave Beam; Inne
tr: Hava yatağının iç yapısı: Coil Beam; ComfortCoil; Çift Katmanlı Hava Cebi; Fiber-Tech; Bal Peteği; I-Beam; Tritech; Wave Beam; Diğer